LEXC/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON Pronouns
ako+Nom+1sg:ako # ;
ka+Nom+2sg:ka # ;
ikaw+Nom+2sg:ikaw # ;
siya+Nom+3sg:siya # ;
kita+Nom+1pl+Incl:kita # ;
kami+Nom+1pl+Excl:kami # ;
kamo+Nom+2pl:kamo # ;
sila+Nom+3pl:sila # ;
ko+Obl+1sg:ko # ;
nakon+Obl+1sg:nakon # ;
mo+Obl+2sg:mo # ;
nimo+Obl+2sg:nimo # ;
niya+Obl+3sg:niya # ;
naton+Obl+1pl+Incl:naton # ;
namon+Obl+1pl+Excl:namon # ;
ninyo+Obl+2pl:ninyo # ;
nyo+Obl+2pl:nyo # ;
nila+Obl+3pl:nila # ;
akon+Loc+1sg:akon # ;
imo+Loc+2sg:imo # ;
iya+Loc+3sg:iya # ;
aton+Loc+1pl+Incl:aton # ;
amon+Loc+1pl+Excl:amon # ;
inyo+Loc+2pl:inyo # ;
ila+Loc+3pl:ila # ;


!TODO Pronoun abbreviations? (homophony)
!TODO Demonstratives
